Nebraska, session 109, LB363.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB363 LB363
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Apprenticeship Grant Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Apprenticeship Grant Act is to provide
underemployed and unemployed individuals with job training and classroom
instruction opportunities in order to earn a livable wage and reduce
their reliance on economic assistance programs and to increase the number
of Nebraska businesses willing to offer apprenticeships to Nebraska
workers.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Apprenticeship Grant Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Apprentice means any person who participates in an
apprenticeship;
(2) Apprenticeship means supervised on-the-job training with
technical classroom instruction on subjects related to the apprentice's
chosen occupation;
(3) Department means the Department of Labor;
(4) Economic assistance program includes aid to dependent children;
aid to the aged, blind, and disabled; the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program; medicaid; child care; emergency assistance; energy
assistance; social services block grants; and other similar programs
administered by the Department of Health and Human Services;
(5) Registered apprenticeship program means an apprenticeship
program registered under the National Apprenticeship Act, 29 U.S.C. 50 et
seq.; and
(6) SNAP Next Step Program has the same meaning as in section
68-1017.02.
Sec. 4. (1) A business is eligible for a grant to assist in
providing an apprenticeship if:
(a) The business certifies that the apprenticeship is part of a
registered apprenticeship program;
(b) The apprentice participates in the SNAP Next Step Program or
-2-

LB363 LB363
2025 2025
programs affiliated with the Nebraska Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act;
(c) The business intends to offer the apprentice full-time
employment upon the successful completion of the apprenticeship that
includes a wage sufficient to reduce participation in economic assistance
programs; and
(d) The apprenticeship will be completed within the State of
Nebraska.
(2) A business seeking a grant under this section shall apply to the
department on a form prescribed by the department.
(3)(a) The department may award grants to businesses under this
section to reimburse the costs for:
(i) Wages for apprentices; or
(ii) Tuition for apprentices to participate in classroom instruction
at institutions of higher education.
(b) The maximum grant award per apprentice is thirty-seven thousand
dollars.
(4) A business may apply for no more than one grant for the same
apprentice and shall not be awarded more than five grants total in any
twelve-month period.
(5) The department shall, to the extent possible, ensure that the
distribution of grants under this section provides equitable access to
the grants by all geographic areas of the state.
(6) The department shall not award more than four million dollars of
grants under this section in any one fiscal year.
(7) The department shall develop a qualified action plan by January
1 of each even-numbered year. The plan shall, at a minimum, set forth the
department's priorities and selection criteria for awarding grants for
apprenticeships under this section. The department shall submit the plan
to the Governor for approval.
(8) The department shall execute a memorandum of understanding with
-3-

LB363 LB363
2025 2025
the Department of Health and Human Services before December 31, 2025, to
ensure the exchange of data regarding registered apprenticeship programs
and the SNAP Next Step Program. The memorandum of understanding shall
require the Department of Health and Human Services to provide de-
identified data concerning the number of Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program recipients that find self-sufficient employment and
the estimated savings to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(9) The department shall submit an annual report to the Governor and
the Legislature on or before October 1, 2026, and on or before October 1
of each year thereafter which includes, but is not necessarily limited
to, a description of the demand for apprenticeship grants under this
section from all geographic regions in Nebraska, a listing of the
recipients and amounts of apprenticeship grants awarded under this
section in the previous fiscal year, the number of apprentices that were
employed by grant recipients upon the completion of an apprenticeship in
the previous fiscal year, and de-identified data regarding the number of
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program recipients that find self-
sufficient employment and the estimated savings to the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically. The department may require recipients
to provide periodic performance reports to enable the department to
fulfill the requirements of this subsection. The report shall contain no
information that is protected by state or federal confidentiality laws.
Sec. 5. (1) An apprentice may apply to the department for a grant
to pay for child care costs while training as an apprentice in a building
or construction trade. To qualify for such grant, the apprentice shall
be:
(a) Represented by an organization described in section 501(c)(5) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
(b) Employed by a redeveloper, contractor, or subcontractor that is
participating in a registered apprenticeship program with a training
-4-

LB363 LB363
2025 2025
facility located in Nebraska.
(2)(a) The department may award grants to apprentices who qualify
under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The maximum grant awarded to any apprentice under this section
is thirty-seven thousand dollars.
(3) The department shall recover any grant awarded to an apprentice
under this section if such apprentice does not complete the
apprenticeship in which the apprentice was participating at the time of
receiving the grant.
Sec. 6. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to govern the award and disbursement of grants pursuant to
the Apprenticeship Grant Act.
Sec. 7. (1) The Apprenticeship Nebraska Cash Fund is created. The
fund shall be used to carry out the Apprenticeship Grant Act. The fund
shall consist of money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and
money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or
private entities. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department may use up to five percent of any appropriation
to carry out the Apprenticeship Grant Act for administrative expenses.
Sec. 8. The Apprenticeship Grant Act terminates on June 30, 2031.
The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated money remaining in the
Apprenticeship Nebraska Cash Fund on such date to the General Fund.
-5-